Illinois, session 104th, HB4588.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The People Over Parking Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5-10 and 5-15 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 845/5-10)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 5-10. Minimum automobile parking requirements 10prohibited. Except as otherwise provided in Section 5-15, 11municipalities with a population of more than 2,000,000 a unit 12of local government may not impose or enforce any minimum 13automobile parking requirements on a development project if 14the project is located within one-half mile of a public 15transportation hub or one-eighth mile of a public 16transportation corridor.17(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 18    (50 ILCS 845/5-15)19    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 20delayed effective date)21    Sec. 5-15. Exceptions and limitations to prohibited 22minimum automobile parking requirements.   HB4588- 2 -LRB104 18195 RTM 31634 b1    (a) If a development project provides automobile parking 2voluntarily, then municipalities with a population of more 3than 2,000,000 a unit of local government may impose on the 4development project requirements for parking spaces to be made 5available for car-share vehicles, for parking spaces to be 6shared with the public, or for parking spaces to be made 7available only for a fee. Municipalities with a population of 8more than 2,000,000 A unit of local government may not require 9voluntarily provided parking to be provided free of charge. 10    (b) Section 5-10 does not apply to minimum automobile 11parking requirements if the requirements conflict with a 12contractual agreement or approved site plan with any 13municipality with a population of more than 2,000,000 the unit 14of local government that was executed or approved on or before 15the effective date of this Act. However, Section 5-10 applies 16to an amendment or extension to the contractual agreement or 17approved site plan if the amendment or extension increases 18automobile parking requirements. 19    (c) A development project may voluntarily build additional 20parking that is not shared with the public. 21    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to prevent 22municipalities with a population of more than 2,000,000 a unit 23of local government from regulating access to on-street 24parking. 25    (e) Nothing in this Act prevents municipalities with a 26population of more than 2,000,000 a unit of local government   HB4588- 3 -LRB104 18195 RTM 31634 b1from enacting or enforcing local laws that establish a maximum 2parking requirement. 3    (f) Nothing in this Act prevents municipalities with a 4population of more than 2,000,000 a unit of local government 5from enacting or enforcing local laws that establish a minimum 6parking requirement for bicycles, including electric-assisted 7bicycles.8(Source: P.A. 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on the 10effective on June 1, 2026.